Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
Article 1. Regulation of Crop Spraying by Aircraft.

§§ 69-21-1 through 69-21-27.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2009, ch. 515, § 18, effective from and after passage April 8, 2009.

§69-21-1. [Codes, 1942, § 5000-21; Laws, 1952, ch. 169, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 475, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1971.]

§69-21-3. [Codes, 1942, § 5000-28; Laws, 1952, ch. 169, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved April 16, 1952).]

§69-21-5. [Codes, 1942, § 5000-22; Laws, 1952, ch. 169, § 2; Laws, 1971, ch. 475, § 2; Laws, 2005, ch. 533, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 2005.]

§69-21-7. [Codes, 1942, § 5000-23; Laws, 1952, ch. 169, § 3; Laws, 1962, ch. 171, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 475, § 3; Laws, 1992, ch. 496, § 34; Laws, 1998, ch. 385, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 533, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 2005.]

§69-21-9. [Codes, 1942, § 5000-23; Laws, 1952, ch. 169, § 3; Laws, 1962, ch. 171, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 475, § 3; Laws, 2005, ch. 533, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 2005.]

§69-21-11. [Codes, 1942, § 5000-23; Laws, 1952, ch. 169, § 3; Laws, 1962, ch. 171, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 475, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1971.]

§69-21-13. [Codes, 1942, § 5000-23; Laws, 1952, ch. 169, § 3; Laws, 1962, ch. 171, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 475, § 3; Laws, 2005, ch. 533, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 2005.]

§69-21-15. [Codes, 1942, § 5000-23; Laws, 1952, ch. 169, § 3; Laws, 1962, ch. 171, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 475, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1971.]

§69-21-17. [Codes, 1942, § 5000-25; Laws, 1952, ch. 169, § 5; Laws, 1971, ch. 475, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1971.]

§69-21-19. [Codes, 1942, § 5000-24; Laws, 1952, ch. 169, § 4; Laws, 1971, ch. 475, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1971.]

§69-21-21. [Codes, 1942, § 5000-26; Laws, 1952, ch. 169, § 6; Laws, 1971, ch. 475, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1971.]

§69-21-23. [Codes, 1942, § 5000-30; Laws, 1952, ch. 169, § 10; Laws, 1971, ch. 475, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1971.]

§69-21-25. [Codes, 1942, § 5000-29; Laws, 1952, ch. 169, § 9; Laws, 1971, ch. 475, § 7; Laws, 2005, ch. 533, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 2005.]

§69-21-27. [Codes, 1942, § 5000-27; Laws, 1952, ch. 169, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved April 16, 1952).]